Mississippi, session 2026, HB1848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of the Delta Health System in Washington County, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with the acquisition and installation of and training for an advanced comprehensive, multi-specialty robotic-assisted surgery platform as described in Section 2 of this act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................... $ 3,345,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be used by the Board of Trustees of the Delta Health System as follows: (a)  Advanced comprehensive, multi-specialty robotic-assisted surgical system................................... $ 2,500,000.00 (b)  Service plan for one (1) year......... $ 195,000.00 (c)  Operating room integration and sterile processing upgrade................................................... $ 275,000.00 (d)  Instrumentation and accessories....... $ 175,000.00 (e)  Multidisciplinary surgeon and staff training and credentialing program............................... $ 120,000.00 (f)  IT integration, data analytics and cybersecurity .................................................... $ 80,000.00 TOTAL............................................ $ 3,345,000.00 SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.